Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 4 Securities

Repeals and recreations. —

2016 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 22, effective July 1, 2017, revised the Wyoming Uniform Securities Act. Specifically the law repealed and recreated former §§

17-4-101

through 17-4-132, as §§

17-4-101

through

17-4-105

, §§

17-4-201

through

17-4-205

, §§

17-4-301

through

17-4-307

, §§

17-4-401

through

17-4-412

, §§

17-4-501

through

17-4-510

, §§

17-4-601

through

17-4-613

, and §

17-4-701

.